Mississippi, session 2026, HB4121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Wykesia Geater of Jackson County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Embezzlement in Jackson County, on July 15, 2004, for which she was sentenced to serve six (6) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released to discharge on September 25, 2009.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.